South Dakota, session 2026, HB1178.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 11:
Terms used in this Act mean:
(1) "Contribution," the amount an investor-owner agrees to contribute, as a fixed
percentage, to an occupant-owner's down payment and monthly mortgage
obligation;
(2) "Eligible home," a single-family residence that:
(a) Complies with all applicable residential building code and local zoning
requirements;
(b) Is the primary residence of an occupant-owner; and
(c) Is not a manufactured or mobile home;
(3) "Investor-owner," a person that makes a contribution toward an occupant-owner's
purchase of an eligible home;
(4) "Occupant-owner," an individual who, together with the individual's spouse, if
applicable, agrees to purchase an eligible home, assisted by the contribution of an
investor-owner; and
(5) "Shared equity agreement," a written agreement setting forth the terms and
conditions of an arrangement in which an investor-owner makes a contribution
toward an occupant-owner's purchase of an eligible home, in exchange for the
occupant-owner's grant of a shared equity encumbrance in favor of the investor-
owner.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 11:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.363.25 2 1178
If an investor-owner and an occupant-owner desire to enter into a shared equity
agreement pursuant to this Act, the investor-owner and the occupant-owner must execute
the agreement and record the agreement in the office of the register of deeds for the
county in which the home is located.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 11:
A shared equity agreement must:
(1) Identify the investor-owner and occupant-owner each by full legal name, residence
or physical location, mailing address, and phone number;
(2) State the location of the eligible home, including the full legal description of the
real property;
(3) Specify the agreed-upon contribution, not exceeding thirty percent;
(4) Establish a term for the agreement, not exceeding fifteen years, unless renewed
as set forth in section 6 of this Act;
(5) Provide that title to the home is held by the occupant-owner, subject to an
encumbrance that:
(a) Secures the occupant-owner's obligation to repay the contribution and any
other agreed upon amount to the investor-owner; and
(b) Is subordinate to the mortgage as required in section 5 of this Act.
(6) Grant the occupant-owner the exclusive right of possession of the home during the
term of the agreement;
(7) Allocate to the occupant-owner all responsibility for the payment of capital
improvements, insurance, maintenance, repairs, taxes, and utilities;
(8) Allow the occupant-owner to elect to buy out the investor-owner's share prior to
expiration of the term;
(9) Contain provisions describing events of default and available remedies, including
termination of the agreement pursuant to section 6 of this Act; and
(10) Pursuant to section 7 of this Act, include provisions for:
(a) Payment due to the investor-owner upon termination of the agreement; and
(b) Conveyance of the investor-owner's interest in the eligible home to the
occupant-owner.
Section 4. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 11:
A shared equity agreement may not:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.363.25 3 1178
(1) Run with the land or be binding or enforceable at law or in equity against any
subsequent bona fide purchaser of the real property;
(2) Prohibit the occupant-owner from using the home in any lawful manner as the
occupant-owner chooses;
(3) Contain a prepayment penalty; or
(4) Prevent the occupant-owner from refinancing a mortgage or lien against the home,
provided that the terms comply with section 5 of this Act.
Section 5. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 11:
The occupant-owner in a shared equity arrangement is required to obtain a
traditional mortgage for the eligible home, which must have a fixed or limited variable
interest rate for at least the term of the shared equity agreement and any renewal of the
agreement.
Section 6. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 11:
A shared equity agreement terminates upon the earlier of:
(1) The investor-owner's receipt of notice of the occupant-owner's election to buy out
the investor-owner's interest in the eligible home;
(2) The maturity of the mortgage against the home;
(3) The transfer of ownership of the home, further encumbrance of the home, except
refinancing as contemplated in section 4 of this Act, or any other conveyance of
title;
(4) The occurrence of an agreed-upon event of default that requires termination of the
agreement;
(5) One hundred twenty days after the death of the occupant-owner, unless the
investor-owner consents in writing to the assumption of the agreement by the
occupant-owner's successor; or
(6) The expiration of the agreement's term, unless the investor-owner and occupant-
owner elect, prior to the expiration, to renew the agreement for a successive term
not exceeding fifteen years.
Section 7. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 11:
Upon termination of a shared equity agreement, the eligible home must be
appraised, at the occupant-owner's expense, by an independent licensed appraiser
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.363.25 4 1178
selected by agreement of the investor-owner and the occupant-owner, and the investor-
owner is entitled to payment in an amount that is the greater of:
(1) The contribution percentage multiplied by the appraised value of the home; or
(2) The actual dollar amount contributed by the investor-owner pursuant to the
agreement, plus interest at a rate equal to one percent higher than the maximum
rate of the first mortgage obtained by the occupant-owner pursuant to section 5 of
this Act.
As of the date of termination, the occupant-owner is responsible for all financial
obligations associated with the home, including any amounts owing under a mortgage.
The investor-owner's contribution is zero percent as of the date of termination.
The investor-owner does not bear any portion of any loss resulting from the sale
or appraisal of the eligible home at a value below the original purchase price of the home,
and the occupant-owner is solely responsible for any resulting loss.
Upon receipt of payment in full pursuant to this section, the investor-owner must
execute and record a release of the encumbrance.
Section 8. That a NEW SECTION be added to a NEW CHAPTER in title 11:
A shared equity agreement entered into pursuant to this Act creates a private co-
ownership arrangement between an investor-owner and an occupant-owner, which
precludes the occupant-owner from using public housing moneys to finance an eligible
home.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.